California statutes. Labor Code
(B) A serious chronic condition. A serious chronic condition is a medical condition due to a disease, illness, or other medical problem or medical disorder that is serious in nature and that persists without full cure or worsens over an extended period of time or requires ongoing treatment to maintain remission or prevent deterioration. Completion of treatment shall be provided for a period of time necessary to complete a
 course of treatment and to arrange for a safe transfer to another provider, as determined by the employer or its claims administrator in consultation with the injured employee and the terminated provider and consistent with good professional practice. Completion of treatment under this paragraph shall not exceed 12 months from the contract termination date.

(C) A terminal illness. A terminal illness is an incurable or irreversible condition that has a high probability of causing death within one year or less. Completion of treatment shall be provided for the duration of a terminal illness.

(D) Performance of a surgery or other procedure that is authorized by the employer or its claims administrator as part of a documented course of treatment and has been recommended and documented by the provider to occur within 180 days of the contract’s termination date.

(4) (A) The employer or its claims administrator may require the terminated provider whose services are continued beyond the contract termination date pursuant to this section to agree in writing to be subject to the same contractual terms and conditions that were imposed upon the provider prior to termination. If the terminated provider does not agree to comply or does not comply with these contractual terms and conditions, the employer or its claims administrator is not required to continue the provider’s services beyond the contract termination date.

(B) Unless otherwise agreed by the terminated provider and the employer or its claims administrator, the services rendered pursuant to this section shall be compensated at rates and methods of payment similar to those used by the medical provider network for currently contracting providers providing similar
 services who are practicing in the same or a similar geographic area as the terminated provider. The employer or its claims administrator is not required to continue the services of a terminated provider if the provider does not accept the payment rates provided for in this paragraph.

(5) An employer or its claims administrator shall ensure that the requirements of this section are met.

(6) This section shall not require an employer or its claims administrator to provide for completion of treatment by a provider whose contract with the medical provider network has been terminated or not renewed for reasons relating to a medical disciplinary cause or reason, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 805 of the Business and
 Professions Code, or fraud or other criminal activity.

(7) Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer or its claims administrator from providing continuity of care beyond the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   (SB 542)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.3.

(a) If the injured employee notifies the employer of the injury or files a claim for workers’ compensation with the employer, the employer shall arrange an initial medical evaluation and begin treatment as required by Section 4600.

(b) The employer shall notify the employee of the existence of the medical provider network established pursuant to this article, the employee’s right to change treating physicians within the network after the first visit, and the method by which the list of participating providers may be accessed by the employee. The employer’s failure to provide notice as required by this subdivision or failure to post the notice as required by Section 3550 shall not be a basis for the employee to treat outside
 the network unless it is shown that the failure to provide notice resulted in a denial of medical care.

(c) If an injured employee disputes either the diagnosis or the treatment prescribed by the treating physician, the employee may seek the opinion of another physician in the medical provider network. If the injured employee disputes the diagnosis or treatment prescribed by the second physician, the employee may seek the opinion of a third physician in the medical provider network.

(d) (1) Selection by the injured employee of a treating physician and any subsequent physicians shall be based on the physician’s specialty or recognized expertise in treating the particular injury or condition in question.

(2) Treatment by a specialist who is not a member of the medical provider network may be
 permitted on a case-by-case basis if the medical provider network does not contain a physician who can provide the approved treatment and the treatment is approved by the employer or the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 50.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.4.

(a) (1) The administrative director shall contract with individual physicians, as described in paragraph (2), or an independent medical review organization to perform medical provider network (MPN) independent medical reviews pursuant to this section.

(2) Only a physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of the Business and Professions Code may be an MPN independent medical reviewer.

(3) The administrative director shall ensure that an MPN independent medical reviewer or those within the review organization shall do all of the following:

(A) Be appropriately credentialed and
 privileged.

(B) Ensure that the reviews provided by the medical professionals are timely, clear, and credible, and that reviews are monitored for quality on an ongoing basis.

(C) Ensure that the method of selecting medical professionals for individual cases achieves a fair and impartial panel of medical professionals who are qualified to render recommendations regarding the clinical conditions consistent with the medical utilization schedule established pursuant to Section 5307.27.

(D) Ensure the confidentiality of medical records and the review materials, consistent with the requirements of this section and applicable state and federal law.

(E) Ensure the independence of the medical professionals retained to perform the reviews through
 conflict-of-interest policies and prohibitions, and ensure adequate screening for conflicts of interest.

(4) A medical professional selected by the administrative director or the independent medical review organization to review medical treatment decisions shall be a physician, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), who meets the following minimum requirements:

(A) The medical professional shall be a clinician knowledgeable in the treatment of the employee’s medical condition, knowledgeable about the proposed treatment, and familiar with guidelines and protocols in the area of treatment under review.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the medical professional shall hold a nonrestricted license in any state of the United States, and for a physician, a current certification by a recognized American medical
 specialty board in the area or areas appropriate to the condition or treatment under review.

(C) The medical professional shall have no history of disciplinary action or sanctions, including, but not limited to, loss of staff privileges or participation restrictions taken or pending by any hospital, government, or regulatory body.

(b) If, after the third physician’s opinion, the treatment or diagnostic service remains disputed, the injured employee may request an MPN independent medical review regarding the disputed treatment or diagnostic service still in dispute after the third physician’s opinion in accordance with Section 4616.3. The standard to be utilized for an MPN independent medical review is identical to that contained in the medical treatment utilization schedule established in Section 5307.27.

(c) An
 application for an MPN independent medical review shall be submitted to the administrative director on a one-page form provided by the administrative director entitled “MPN Independent Medical Review Application.” The form shall contain a signed release from the injured employee, or a person authorized pursuant to law to act on behalf of the injured employee, authorizing the release of medical and treatment information. The injured employee may provide any relevant material or documentation with the application. The administrative director or the independent medical review organization shall assign the MPN independent medical reviewer.

(d) Following receipt of the application for an MPN independent medical review, the employer or insurer shall provide the MPN independent medical reviewer, assigned pursuant to subdivision (c), with all information that was considered in relation to the disputed treatment or diagnostic service, including both of
 the following:

(1) A copy of all correspondence from, and received by, any treating physician who provided a treatment or diagnostic service to the injured employee in connection with the injury.

(2) A complete and legible copy of all medical records and other information used by the physicians in making a decision regarding the disputed treatment or diagnostic service.

(e) Upon receipt of information and documents related to the application for an MPN independent medical review, the MPN independent medical reviewer shall conduct a physical examination of the injured employee at the employee’s discretion. The MPN independent medical reviewer may order any diagnostic tests necessary to make his or her determination regarding medical treatment. Utilizing the medical treatment utilization schedule established pursuant
 to Section 5307.27, and taking into account any reports and information provided, the MPN independent medical reviewer shall determine whether the disputed health care service was consistent with Section 5307.27 based on the specific medical needs of the injured employee.

(f) The MPN independent medical reviewer shall issue a report to the administrative director, in writing, and in layperson’s terms to the maximum extent practicable, containing his or her analysis and determination as to whether the disputed health care service was consistent with the medical treatment utilization schedule established pursuant to Section 5307.27, within 30 days of the examination of the injured employee, or within less time as prescribed by the administrative director. If the disputed health care service has not been provided and the MPN independent medical reviewer certifies in writing that an imminent and serious threat to the health of the injured employee
 may exist, including, but not limited to, serious pain, the potential loss of life, limb, or major bodily function, or the immediate and serious deterioration of the injured employee, the report shall be expedited and rendered within three days of the examination by the MPN independent medical reviewer. Subject to the approval of the administrative director, the deadlines for analyses and determinations involving both regular and expedited reviews may be extended by the administrative director for up to three days in extraordinary circumstances or for good cause.

(g) The MPN independent medical reviewer’s analysis shall cite the injured employee’s medical condition, the relevant documents in the record, and the relevant findings associated with the documents or any other information submitted to the MPN independent medical reviewer in order to support the determination.

(h) The
 administrative director shall immediately adopt the determination of the MPN independent medical reviewer, and shall promptly issue a written decision to the parties.

(i) If the determination of the MPN independent medical reviewer finds that the disputed treatment or diagnostic service is consistent with Section 5307.27, the injured employee may seek the disputed treatment or diagnostic service from a physician of his or her choice from within or outside the medical provider network. Treatment outside the medical provider network shall be provided consistent with Section 5307.27. The employer shall be liable for the cost of any approved medical treatment in accordance with Section 5307.1 or 5307.11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 174.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.5.

(a) For purposes of this article, “employer” means a self-insured employer, joint powers authority, or the state.

(b) For purposes of this article, “entity that provides physician network services” means a medical network licensed by the Department of Insurance or Department of Managed Health Care, or a third-party claims adjusting organization licensed by the Department of Insurance or certified by the Office of Self-Insurance Plans, or a legal entity that offers medical management or physician network
 services within California.

(c) For purposes of this article, “entity that provides ancillary 
 services” means an entity that provides medical services or goods, as authorized by Section 4600, by a nonphysician, including, but not limited to, interpreter services, physical therapy, and pharmaceutical services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 647, Sec. 8.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.6.

No additional examinations shall be ordered by the appeals board and no other reports shall be admissable to resolve any controversy arising out of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 27.   Effective April 19, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.7.

(a) A health care organization certified pursuant to Section 4600.5 shall be deemed approved pursuant to this article if the requirements of this article are met, as determined by the administrative director.

(b) A health care service plan, licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be deemed approved for purposes of this article if it has a reasonable number of physicians with competency in occupational medicine, as determined by the administrative director.

(c) A group disability insurance policy, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106 of the Insurance Code, that covers hospital,
 surgical, and medical care expenses shall be deemed approved for purposes of this article if it has a reasonable number of physicians with competency in occupational medicine, as determined by the administrative director. For the purposes of this section, a group disability insurance policy shall not include Medicare supplement, vision-only, dental-only, and Champus-supplement insurance. For purposes of this section, a group disability insurance policy shall not include hospital indemnity, accident-only, and specified disease insurance that pays benefits on a fixed benefit, cash-payment-only basis.

(d) Any Taft-Hartley health and welfare fund shall be deemed approved for purposes of this article if it has a reasonable number of physicians with competency in occupational medicine, as determined by the administrative director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 51.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Medical-Legal Expenses [4620. - 4628.]

4620.

(a) For purposes of this article, a medical-legal expense means any costs and expenses incurred by or on behalf of any party, the administrative director, or the board, which expenses may include X-rays, laboratory fees, other diagnostic tests, medical reports, medical records, medical testimony, and, as needed, interpreter’s fees by a certified interpreter pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11435.05) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Section 68566 of, the Government Code, for the purpose of proving or disproving a contested claim.

(b) A contested claim exists when the employer knows or reasonably should know that the employee is claiming entitlement to any benefit arising out of a claimed
 industrial injury and one of the following conditions exists:

(1) The employer rejects liability for a claimed benefit.

(2) The employer fails to accept liability for benefits after the expiration of a reasonable period of time within which to decide if it will contest the claim.

(3) The employer fails to respond to a demand for payment of benefits after the expiration of any time period fixed by statute for the payment of indemnity.

(c) Costs of medical evaluations, diagnostic tests, and interpreters incidental to the production of a medical report do not constitute medical-legal expenses unless the medical report is capable of proving or disproving a disputed medical fact, the determination of which is essential to an adjudication of the employee’s
 claim for benefits. In determining whether a report meets the requirements of this subdivision, a judge shall give full consideration to the substance as well as the form of the report, as required by applicable statutes and regulations.

(d) If the injured employee cannot effectively communicate with an examining physician because he or she cannot proficiently speak or understand the English language, the injured employee is entitled to the services of a qualified interpreter during the medical examination. Upon request of the injured employee, the employer or insurance carrier
 shall pay the costs of the interpreter services, as set forth in the fee schedule adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5811. An employer shall not be required to pay for the services of an interpreter who is provisionally certified unless either the employer consents in advance to the selection of the individual who provides the interpreting service or the injured worker requires interpreting service in a language other than the languages designated pursuant to Section 11435.40 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 52.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.

(a) In accordance with the rules of practice and procedure of the appeals board, the employee, or the dependents of a deceased employee, shall be reimbursed for his or her medical-legal expenses and reasonably, actually, and necessarily incurred, except as provided in Section 4064. The reasonableness of, and necessity for, incurring these expenses shall be determined with respect to the time when the expenses were actually incurred. Costs for medical evaluations, diagnostic tests, and interpreters’ services incidental to the production of a medical report shall not be incurred earlier than the date of receipt by the employer, the employer’s insurance carrier, or, if represented, the attorney of record, of all reports and documents required by the administrative director incidental to the services. This subdivision is not applicable unless there has been compliance with Section 4620.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 4061 and 4062, no comprehensive medical-legal evaluations, except those at the request of an employer, shall be performed during the first 60 days after the notice of claim has been filed pursuant to Section 5401, and neither the employer nor the employee shall be liable for any expenses incurred for comprehensive medical-legal evaluations performed within the first 60 days after the notice of claim has been filed pursuant to Section 5401.

(c) Comprehensive medical-legal evaluations may be performed at any time after the claim form has been filed pursuant to Section 5401 if the employer has rejected the claim.

(d) Where, at the request of the employer, the employer’s insurance carrier, the administrative director, the appeals board, or a referee, the employee submits to examination by a physician, he or she shall be entitled to receive, in addition to all other benefits herein provided, all reasonable expenses of transportation, meals, and lodging incident to reporting for the examination to the same extent and manner as provided for in Section 4600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 43.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4622.

All medical-legal expenses for which the employer is liable shall, upon receipt by the employer of all reports and documents required by the administrative director incident to the services, be paid to whom the funds and expenses are due, as follows:

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), within 60 days after receipt by the employer of each separate, written billing and report, and if payment is not made within this period, that portion of the billed sum then unreasonably unpaid shall be increased by 10 percent, together with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per annum retroactive to the date of receipt of the bill and report by the employer. If the employer, within the 60-day period, contests the
 reasonableness and necessity for incurring the fees, services, and expenses using the explanation of review required by Section 4603.3, payment shall be made within 20 days of the service of an order of the appeals board or the administrative director pursuant to Section 4603.6 directing payment.

(2) The penalty provided for in paragraph (1) shall not apply if both of the following occur:

 (A) The employer pays the provider that portion of his or her charges that do not exceed the amount deemed reasonable pursuant to subdivision (e) within 60 days of receipt of the report and itemized billing.

(B) The employer prevails.

(b) (1) If the provider contests the amount paid, the provider may request a second review within 90 days of the
 service of the explanation of review. The request for a second review shall be submitted to the employer on a form prescribed by the administrative director and shall include all of the following:

(A) The date of the explanation of review and the claim number or other unique identifying number provided on the explanation of review.

(B) The party or parties requesting the service.

(C) Any item and amount in dispute.

(D) The additional payment requested and the reason therefor.

(E) Any additional information requested in the original explanation of review and any other information provided in support of the additional payment requested.

(2) If the provider does not request a second review within 90 days, the bill will be deemed satisfied and neither the employer nor the employee shall be liable for any further payment.

(3) Within 14 days of the request for second review, the employer shall respond with a final written determination on each of the items or amounts in dispute, including whether additional payment will be made.

(4) If the provider contests the amount paid, after receipt of the second review, the provider shall request an independent bill review as provided for in Section 4603.6.

(c) If the employer denies all or a portion of the amount billed for any reason other than the amount to be paid pursuant to the fee schedules in effect on the date of service, the provider may object to the denial within 90 days of the service of
 the explanation of review. If the provider does not object to the denial within 90 days, neither the employer nor the employee shall be liable for the amount that was denied. If the provider objects to the denial within 90 days of the service of the explanation of review, the employer shall file a petition and a declaration of readiness to proceed with the appeals board within 60 days of service of the objection. If the employer prevails before the appeals board, the appeals board shall order the physician to reimburse the employer for the amount of the paid charges found to be unreasonable.

(d) If requested by the employee, or the dependents of a deceased employee, within 20 days from the filing of an order of the appeals board directing payment, and where payment is not made within that period, that portion of the billed sum then unpaid shall be increased by 10 percent, together with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per annum
 retroactive to the date of the filing of the order of the board directing payment.

(e) (1) Using the explanation of review as described in Section 4603.3, the employer shall notify the provider of the services, the employee, or if represented, his or her attorney, if the employer contests the reasonableness or necessity of incurring these expenses, and shall indicate the reasons therefor.

(2) The appeals board shall promulgate all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations to insure compliance with this section, and shall take such further steps as may be necessary to guarantee that the rules and regulations are enforced.

(3) The provisions of Sections 5800 and 5814 shall not apply to this section.

(f) Nothing contained in this
 section shall be construed to create a rebuttable presumption of entitlement to payment of an expense upon receipt by the employer of the required reports and documents. This section is not applicable unless there has been compliance with Sections 4620 and 4621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 53.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.

(a) Effective for services provided on or after January 1, 2017, all bills for medical-legal evaluation or medical-legal expense shall be submitted to the employer within 12 months of the date of service in the manner prescribed by the administrative director. The administrative director shall adopt rules to define circumstances that constitute good cause for an exception to the 12-month period. Bills for medical-legal charges are barred unless timely submitted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 4628, all charges for medical-legal expenses for which the employer is liable that are not in excess of those set forth in the official
 medical-legal fee schedule adopted pursuant to Section 5307.6 shall be paid promptly pursuant to Section 4622.

(c) If the employer contests the reasonableness of the charges it has paid, the employer may file a petition with the appeals board to obtain reimbursement of the charges from the physician that are considered to be unreasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 214, Sec. 3.   (SB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4626.

All charges for X-rays, laboratory services, and other diagnostic tests provided in connection with an industrial medical-legal evaluation shall be billed in accordance with the official medical fee schedule adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5307.1 and shall be itemized separately in accordance with rules promulgated by the administrative director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 596, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

4627.

The board and the administrative director may promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to interpret this article and compel compliance with its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 596, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

4628.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no person, other than the physician who signs the medical-legal report, except a nurse performing those functions routinely performed by a nurse, such as taking blood pressure, shall examine the injured employee or participate in the nonclerical preparation of the report, including all of the following:

(1) Taking a complete history.

(2) Reviewing and summarizing prior medical records.

(3) Composing and drafting the conclusions of the report.

(b) The report shall disclose the date when and location where the evaluation was performed; that the physician or physicians signing the report actually performed the evaluation; whether the evaluation performed and the time spent performing the evaluation was in compliance with the guidelines established by the administrative director pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (j) of Section 139.2 or Section 5307.6 and shall disclose the name and qualifications of each person who performed any services in connection with the report, including diagnostic studies, other than its clerical preparation. If the report discloses that the evaluation performed or the time spent performing the evaluation was not in compliance with the guidelines established by the administrative director, the report shall explain, in detail, any variance and the reason or reasons therefor.

(c) If the initial outline of a patient’s history or excerpting of prior medical records is not done by the physician, the physician shall review the excerpts and the entire outline and shall make additional inquiries and examinations as are necessary and appropriate to identify and determine the relevant medical issues.

(d) No amount may be charged in excess of the direct charges for the physician’s professional services and the reasonable costs of laboratory examinations, diagnostic studies, and other medical tests, and reasonable costs of clerical expense necessary to producing the report. Direct charges for the physician’s professional services shall include reasonable overhead expense.

(e) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall make the report inadmissible as evidence and shall eliminate any liability for payment of any medical-legal expense incurred in connection with the report.

(f) Knowing failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall subject the physician to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation to be assessed by a workers’ compensation judge or the appeals board. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund.

(g) A physician who is assessed a civil penalty under this section may be terminated, suspended, or placed on probation as a qualified medical evaluator pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (l) of Section 139.2.

(h) Knowing failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall subject the physician to contempt pursuant to the judicial powers vested in the appeals board.

(i) Any person billing for medical-legal evaluations, diagnostic procedures, or diagnostic services performed by persons other than those employed by the reporting physician or physicians, or a medical corporation owned by the reporting physician or physicians shall specify the amount paid or to be paid to those persons for the evaluations, procedures, or services. This subdivision shall not apply to any procedure or service defined or valued pursuant to Section 5307.1.

(j) The report shall contain a declaration by the physician signing the report, under penalty of perjury, stating:

“I declare under penalty of perjury that the information contained in this report and its attachments, if any, is true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, except as to information that I have indicated I received from others. As to that information, I declare under penalty of perjury that the information accurately describes the information provided to me and, except as noted herein, that I believe it to be true.”

The foregoing declaration shall be dated and signed by the reporting physician and shall indicate the county wherein it was signed.

(k) The physician shall provide a curriculum vitae upon request by a party and include a statement concerning the percent of the physician’s total practice time that is annually devoted to medical treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 639, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disability Payments [4650. - 4664.]

4650.

(a) If an injury causes temporary disability, the first payment of temporary disability indemnity shall be made not later than 14 days after knowledge of the injury and disability, on which date all indemnity then due shall be paid, unless liability for the injury is earlier denied.

(b) (1) If the injury causes permanent disability, the first payment shall be made within 14 days after the date of last payment of temporary disability indemnity, except as provided in paragraph (2). When the last payment of temporary disability indemnity has been made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4656, and regardless of whether the extent of permanent disability can be determined at that date, the employer
 nevertheless shall commence the timely payment required by this subdivision and shall continue to make these payments until the employer’s reasonable estimate of permanent disability indemnity due has been paid, and if the amount of permanent disability indemnity due has been determined, until that amount has been paid.

(2) Prior to an award of permanent disability indemnity, a permanent disability indemnity payment shall not be required if the employer has offered the employee a position that pays at least 85 percent of the wages and compensation paid to the employee at the time of injury or if the employee is employed in a position that pays at least 100 percent of the wages and compensation paid to the employee at the time of injury, provided that when an award of permanent disability indemnity is made, the amount then due shall be calculated from the last date for which temporary disability indemnity was paid, or the date the employee’s
 disability became permanent and stationary, whichever is earlier.

(c) Payment of temporary or permanent disability indemnity subsequent to the first payment shall be made as due every two weeks on the day designated with the first payment.

(d) If any indemnity payment is not made timely as required by this section, the amount of the late payment shall be increased 10 percent and shall be paid, without application, to the employee, unless the employer continues the employee’s wages under a salary continuation plan, as defined in subdivision (g). No increase shall apply to any payment due prior to or within 14 days after the date the claim form was submitted to the employer under Section 5401. No increase shall apply when, within the 14-day period specified under subdivision (a), the employer is unable to determine whether temporary disability indemnity payments are owed and advises
 the employee, in the manner prescribed in rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 138.4, why payments cannot be made within the 14-day period, what additional information is required to make the decision whether temporary disability indemnity payments are owed, and when the employer expects to have the information required to make the decision.

(e) If the employer is insured for its obligation to provide compensation, the employer shall be obligated to reimburse the insurer for the amount of increase in indemnity payments, made pursuant to subdivision (d), if the late payment which gives rise to the increase in indemnity payments, is due less than seven days after the insurer receives the completed claim form from the employer. Except as specified in this subdivision, an employer shall not be obligated to reimburse an insurer nor shall an insurer be permitted to seek reimbursement, directly or indirectly, for the amount of increase in
 indemnity payments specified in this section.

(f) If an employer is obligated under subdivision (e) to reimburse the insurer for the amount of increase in indemnity payments, the insurer shall notify the employer in writing, within 30 days of the payment, that the employer is obligated to reimburse the insurer and shall bill and collect the amount of the payment no later than at final audit. However, the insurer shall not be obligated to collect, and the employer shall not be obligated to reimburse, amounts paid pursuant to subdivision (d) unless the aggregate total paid in a policy year exceeds one hundred dollars ($100). The employer shall have 60 days, following notice of the obligation to reimburse, to appeal the decision of the insurer to the Department of Insurance. The notice of the obligation to reimburse shall specify that the employer has the right to appeal the decision of the insurer as provided in this subdivision.

(g) For purposes of this section, “salary continuation plan” means a plan that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The plan is paid for by the employer pursuant to statute, collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, or established employer policy.

(2) The plan provides the employee on his or her regular payday with salary not less than the employee is entitled to receive pursuant to statute, collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, or established employer policy and not less than the employee would otherwise receive in indemnity payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 54.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4650.5.

Notwithstanding Section 4650, in the case of state civil service employees, employees of the Regents of the University of California, and employees of the Board of Trustees of the California State University, the disability payment shall be made from the first day the injured employee leaves work as a result of the injury, if the injury is the result of a criminal act of violence against the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

(a) (1) A disability indemnity payment shall not be made by any written instrument unless it is immediately negotiable and payable in cash, on demand, without discount, at some established place of business in the state.

(2) This section does not prohibit an employer from depositing the disability indemnity payment in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union of the employee’s choice in this state, provided the employee has voluntarily authorized the deposit, nor does it prohibit an employer from electronically depositing the disability indemnity payment in an account in any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union, that the employee has previously authorized to receive electronic deposits of payroll,
 unless the employee has requested, in writing, that disability indemnity benefits not be electronically deposited in the account.

(3) (A) An employer may commence a program under which disability indemnity payments are deposited in a prepaid card account for the employee. The employee shall provide written consent to the employer to use a prepaid card account for the employee’s disability payments. The prepaid card account shall meet the applicable requirements of Section 1339.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. For purposes of this section, the terms “prepaid card” and “prepaid card account” have the same meanings as defined in Section 1339.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. For purposes of this section, a prepaid card shall also meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Allow the employee to withdraw the entire balance on the card in one transaction
 without incurring fees.

(ii) Allow the employee reasonable access to in-network automatic teller machines (ATMs).

(iii) Allow the employee to make point-of-sale purchases without incurring fees from the financial institution.

(iv) Prohibit a link to any form of credit, including a loan against future payments or a cash advance on future payments.
